Idaho, session 2025, S1174.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. In addition to any other appropriation provided by law,
there is hereby appropriated to the Industrial Commission the following
amounts to be expended according to the designated programs and expense
classes from the listed funds for the period July 1, 2025, through June 30,
2026:
FOR FOR FOR
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY TOTAL
I. COMPENSATION:
FROM:
Industrial Administration
Fund $178,100 $267,700 $79,800 $525,600
II. REHABILITATION:
FROM:
Industrial Administration
Fund $10,500 $130,200 $140,700
III. CRIME VICTIMS COMPENSATION:
FROM:
Crime Victims Compensation
Fund $36,000 $36,000
GRAND TOTAL $178,100 $314,200 $210,000 $702,300
SECTION 2. In addition to the appropriation made in Section 1, Chap-
ter 111, Laws of 2024, and any other appropriation provided by law, there is
hereby appropriated to the Industrial Commission in the Compensation Pro-
gram $47,000 for operating expenditures from the Peace Officer and Detention
Officer Temporary Disability Fund for proper fund allocation of the Indus-


trial Commission's Redesigned Information System (IRIS) project for the pe-
riod July 1, 2024, through June 30, 2025.
SECTION 3. Notwithstanding any other appropriation by law, the appro-
priation to the Industrial Commission is hereby reduced by the following
amounts for the designated programs for operating expenditures from the
listed funds for the period July 1, 2024, through June 30, 2025:
FROM:
I. COMPENSATION:
FROM:
Industrial Administration Fund $41,100
II. CRIME VICTIMS COMPENSATION:
FROM:
Crime Victims Compensation Fund $5,900
GRAND TOTAL $47,000
SECTION 4. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, Sections 2 and 3 of this act shall be in full force and ef-
fect on and after passage and approval, and Section 1 of this act shall be in
full force and effect on and after July 1, 2025.